Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-962
Poll watchers; credential; requirements; notice.

(1) For poll watchers eligible under subdivision (1)(a)(i) of section 32-961, the election commissioner or county clerk shall provide a credential as an election observer for each poll watcher for whom the election commissioner or county clerk receives notice of appointment under section 32-961. The election commissioner or county clerk may approve, as a credential, a name badge provided by the person who appointed the poll watcher if the name badge includes the name of the poll watcher and the name of the person or organization who appointed the poll watcher and if the name badge does not contain any campaign materials advocating a vote for or against any candidate, political party, or position on a ballot question.

(2) For poll watchers eligible under subdivision (1)(a)(ii) of section 32-961, the Secretary of State shall provide the national or international election monitoring organization with the proper credentials for each poll watcher for whom the Secretary of State receives notice. The Secretary of State shall also notify the election commissioner or county clerk in each of the counties in which the poll watchers would be observing, and the notice shall include the name of the organization, a list of the poll watchers, a description of the credential that will be worn by the poll watchers, and the plans of the organization for election day, including which counties and precincts the organization plans to observe.

Laws 2020, LB1055, § 11;

Laws 2022, LB843, § 37.